bg-BG: Тип монтаж на соло барабан: Монтаж за маршов носач; Мулти-монтаж/монтаж с конзола; Монтаж на рак; Монтаж на стойка за малко барабанче (стандартен); Друго
pt-BR: Caixa, tipo de instalação: Suporte de marcha (colete); Montagem múltipla/suporte; Montagem em rack; Montagem em estante de caixa (padrão); Outro
ru: Тип крепления малого барабана: Крепление для маршевого барабана; Универсальное крепление/крепление на кронштейне; Крепление на раму; Крепление на стойку малого барабана (стандартное); Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže maličnega bobna: Nosilec za korakajoči orkester; Večnamenski nosilec/konzola; Montaža na stojalo; Montaža na stojalo za mali boben (standardno); Drugo
zh-CN: 响弦鼓安装类型: 行进背带安装座; 多安装座/支架安装座; 鼓架安装座; 军鼓架安装座（标准）; 其他
hu: Pergődob rögzítési típusa: Menetfelszerelés-konzol; Multi/bilincses konzol; Állványkonzol; Pergőállvány-konzol (standard); Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ inštalácie malého bubna: Montáž na nosič pre pochodový bubon; Viacnásobná/konzolová montáž; Montáž na rampu; Montáž na stojan na malý bubon (štandardná); Iná
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do tambor de tarola: Suporte de transporte de marcha; Montagem múltipla/montagem com suporte; Montagem em rack; Montagem em suporte de tarola (padrão); Outra
ja: スネアドラムマウントタイプ: マーチングキャリアマウント; マルチマウント / ブラケットマウント; ラックマウント; スネアスタンドマウント (標準); その他
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งกลองสแนร์: เมานท์ชุดสะพายมาร์ชชิ่ง; มัลติเมานท์/เมานท์แบร็กเก็ต; เมานท์แร็ค; เมานท์ขาตั้งสแนร์ (มาตรฐาน); อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di montaggio del rullante: Supporto per banda musicale; Supporto multiplo/a staffa; Supporto rack; Supporto per rullante (standard); Altro
fi: Virvelirummun kiinnitystyyppi: Marssitelinekiinnitys; Monitoimikiinnitys/pidikekiinnitys; Räkkikiinnitys; Virvelitelinekiinnitys (vakio); Muu
de: Bauart der Snaredrum: Marching-Carrier-Halterung; Multi-Halterung/Klammer-Halterung; Rack-Halterung; Snare-Ständer-Halterung (Standard); Andere
nl: Type montage snaredrum: Marching carrier-bevestiging; Multi-mount/bracket-bevestiging; Rack-bevestiging; Snarestandaardbevestiging (standaard); Anders
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης ταμπούρου: Βάση μεταφοράς για παρέλαση; Βάση πολλαπλών χρήσεων/με βραχίονα; Βάση ικριώματος (rack); Βάση ταμπούρου (τυπική); Άλλο
zh-TW: 小鼓安裝類型: 行進鼓背架安裝; 多用途安裝/支架安裝; 鼓架安裝; 小鼓架安裝 (標準); 其他
ro-RO: Tip de montare a tobei mici: Suport ham pentru marș; Suport multiplu/suport cu clemă; Montare pe rack; Montare pe stativ de premier (standard); Altele
sv: Typ av montering för virveltrumma: Fäste för bärsele; Multifäste/bygelfäste; Rackfäste; Virvelstativfäste (standard); Övrigt
tr: Trampet montaj tipi: Bando taşıyıcı bağlantısı; Çoklu bağlantı/braket bağlantısı; Raf bağlantısı; Trampet standı bağlantısı (standart); Diğer
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt trống Snare: Ngàm gắn khung đeo hành khúc; Ngàm gắn đa năng/giá đỡ; Ngàm gắn giá đỡ; Ngàm gắn chân đế trống snare (tiêu chuẩn); Khác
es: Tipo de montaje del redoblante: Soporte de arnés de marcha; Montaje múltiple o de soporte; Montaje en rack; Montaje en soporte de redoblante (estándar); Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta montaže doboša: Nosač za marširanje; Višestruki nosač / nosač s konzolom; Montaža na stalak; Montaža na stalak za doboš (standardna); Ostalo
en: Snare drum mounting type: Marching carrier mount; Multi-mount/bracket mount; Rack mount; Snare stand mount (standard); Other
fr: Type de fixation de la caisse claire: Fixation pour harnais de marche; Support multiple/fixation par support; Montage en rack; Montage sur pied de caisse claire (standard); Autre
cs: Typ uchycení malého bubnu: Úchyt na pochodový nosič; Multi-mount / úchyt na konzolu; Úchyt na rampu; Úchyt na stojan (standardní); Jiné
lt-LT: Mažojo būgno tvirtinimo tipas: Žygiuojamojo būgno laikiklio tvirtinimas; Kelių padėčių / gembės tvirtinimas; Rėminis tvirtinimas; Būgno stovo tvirtinimas (standartinis); Kita
da: Monteringstype for lilletromme: Til marching carrier; Multi-mount/beslag; Rack-montering; Til lilletrommestativ (standard); Andet
ko: 스네어 드럼 장착 유형: 마칭 캐리어 마운트; 멀티 마운트/브래킷 마운트; 랙 마운트; 스네어 스탠드 마운트(표준); 기타
pl: Typ mocowania werbla: Mocowanie do noszaka marszowego; Uchwyt wielofunkcyjny / wspornikowy; Mocowanie do ramy; Mocowanie do statywu pod werbel (standardowe); Inne
nb: Monteringstype for skarptromme: Feste for marsjbæresele; Multifeste/brakettfeste; Rack-feste; Skarptrommestativ-feste (standard); Annet